Illinois, session 104th, HB5188.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by changing Section 2310-715 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-715)8    Sec. 2310-715. Community Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity 9and Access Leadership (HEAL) Grant Program.10    (a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that there are 11communities in Illinois that experience significant health 12care disparities, as recently emphasized by the COVID-19 13pandemic, aggravated by social determinants of health and a 14lack of sufficient access to high quality health care 15resources, particularly community-based services, preventive 16care, obstetric care, chronic disease management, and 17specialty care. Community safety-net Safety-net hospitals, as 18defined under the this Section Illinois Public Aid Code, serve 19as the anchors of the health care system for many of these 20communities. These Safety-net hospitals not only care for 21their patients, they also are rooted in their communities and 22provide by providing jobs and partner partnering with local 23organizations to help address the social determinants of   HB5188- 2 -LRB104 18401 BDA 31843 b1health, such as food, housing, and transportation needs.2    However, community safety-net hospitals serve a 3significant number of Medicare, Medicaid, and uninsured 4patients, and therefore, are heavily dependent on underfunded 5government payers, and are heavily burdened by uncompensated 6care. At the same time, the overall cost of providing care has 7increased substantially in recent years, driven by increasing 8costs for staffing, prescription drugs, technology, and 9infrastructure.10    For all of these reasons, the General Assembly finds that 11the long-term sustainability of community safety-net hospitals 12is threatened. While the General Assembly has provided is 13providing funding to the Department to be paid to support the 14expenses of specific community safety-net hospitals in 15previous fiscal years State Fiscal Year 2023, such annual, ad 16hoc funding is not a reliable and stable source of funding that 17will enable community safety-net hospitals to develop 18strategies to achieve long term sustainability. Such annual, 19ad hoc funding also does not provide the State with 20transparency and accountability to ensure that such funding is 21being used effectively and efficiently to maximize the benefit 22to members of the community.23    Therefore, it is the intent of the General Assembly that 24the Department of Public Health and the Department of 25Healthcare and Family Services jointly create provide options 26and recommendations to the General Assembly by February 1,   HB5188- 3 -LRB104 18401 BDA 31843 b12023, for the establishment of a permanent Community 2Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and Access Leadership (HEAL) 3Grant Program, in accordance with this Section. It is the 4intention of the General Assembly that, beginning in fiscal 5year 2027 during State fiscal years 2024 through 2029, the 6Community Safety-Net Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and 7Access Leadership (HEAL) Grant Program shall be supported by 8an annual funding pool of at least up to $100,000,000, subject 9to appropriation.10    (a-5) Definitions. As used in this Section:11    "Community safety-net hospital" means a hospital that 12satisfies the criteria under Section 5-5e.1 of the Illinois 13Public Aid Code and that is not part of a health system with 14more than $1,000,000,000 in assets.15    "Health system" means a group of hospitals that are owned 16and operated by the same entity.17    "Medically underserved area" means a geographic area with 18a shortage of primary health care services for residents. 19    (b) By February 1, 2027 2023, the Department of Public 20Health and the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 21shall provide a joint report to the General Assembly on 22options and recommendations for the establishment of a 23permanent Community Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and 24Access Leadership (HEAL) Grant Program to be administered by 25the State. For this report, "safety-net hospital" means a 26hospital identified by the Department of Healthcare and Family   HB5188- 4 -LRB104 18401 BDA 31843 b1Services under Section 5-5e.1 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 2The Departments of Public Health and Healthcare and Family 3Services may consult with the statewide association 4representing a majority of hospitals and community safety-net 5hospitals on the report. The report may include, but need not 6be limited to:7        (1) Criteria for a community safety-net hospital to be 8    eligible for the program, such as:9            (A) The hospital is a community safety-net 10        hospital as defined in this Section participating 11        provider in at least one Medicaid managed care plan.12            (B) The hospital is located in a medically 13        underserved area.14            (C) The hospital's Medicaid utilization rate (for 15        both inpatient and outpatient services).16            (D) The hospital's Medicare utilization rate (for 17        both inpatient and outpatient services).18            (E) The hospital's uncompensated care percentage.19            (C) (F) The hospital is demonstrably working to 20        expand hospital's role in providing access to 21        services, reducing health disparities, and improving 22        health equity in its service area.23            (G) The hospital's performance on quality 24        indicators.25        (2) Information regarding additional requirements for 26    the Community Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and Access   HB5188- 5 -LRB104 18401 BDA 31843 b1    Leadership (HEAL) Grant Program, such as: 2            (A) an application process and criteria to 3        determine which applications should receive funding, 4        established by the Department of Healthcare and Family 5        Services and the Department of Public Health, with 6        formal input from stakeholders; and7            (B) policies, standards, and procedures developed 8        by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 9        and the Department of Public Health, with formal input 10        from stakeholders, to both administer the program and 11        ensure accountability, that include, at a minimum: 12                (i) transparency: participant hospitals must 13            open all governing board meetings to the public 14            and include space and time for public comment;15                (ii) stakeholder oversight or codetermination: 16            participant hospitals must: 17                    (I) have governing boards comprised of, at 18                a minimum, 51% community members, frontline 19                hospital workers, and patients; and20                    (II) create an advocacy council comprised 21                of community members, frontline hospital 22                workers, patients, and other key stakeholders 23                that has meaningful input into hospital 24                management and strategic decision making that 25                meets at least quarterly and upon its own 26                initiative; and   HB5188- 6 -LRB104 18401 BDA 31843 b1                (iii) wage and labor standards: participant 2            hospitals must: 3                    (I) pay workers a living wage;4                    (II) permit workers to form or join a 5                labor organization of their choice without 6                interference from management; and7                    (III) staff adequately and negotiate a 8                process for resolving formal objections to 9                unsafe staffing. 10        Potential projects eligible for grant funds which may 11    include projects to reduce health disparities, advance 12    health equity, or improve access to or the quality of 13    health care services.14        (3) Potential policies, standards, and procedures to 15    ensure accountability for the use of grant funds.16        (4) Potential strategies to generate federal Medicaid 17    matching funds for expenditures under the program.18        (5) Potential policies, processes, and procedures for 19    the administration of the program.20(Source: P.A. 102-886, eff. 5-17-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)